Utah statutes.
61-1-21.1.   Limitation of prosecutions.

(1)  No indictment or information may be returned or civil complaint filed under this chapter more than five years after the alleged violation.

(2)  As to causes of action arising from violations of this chapter, the limitation of prosecutions provided in this section supersedes the limitation of actions provided in Section 76-1-302 and Title 78B, Chapter 2, Statutes of Limitations.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

